Louisiana, session 2026, HB1080.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
11 Section 1. R.S. 33:4754.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
12 §4754.1. Demolition of condemned commercial property; suit; city of Shreveport
13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the city of
14 Shreveport may file a suit against the owner of a condemned commercial property
15 to compel the property owner to demolish the condemned property. The suit shall
16 be filed only after the property owner has been given an opportunity to demolish the
17 condemned property and to pay any liens that have been placed on the property. The
18 time period provided to the owner to demolish the property and to pay any liens
19 placed on the property shall be as provided by ordinance of the governing authority
20 of the city. The city may recover court costs, attorney fees, and all costs incurred in
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1080 ENROLLED
1 locating the owner, notifying the owner, and the enforcement and collection of the
2 amount secured by any lien on the property.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.